Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 3. Parental Placement Adoptions.

§ 63.2-1230.
Placement of children by parent or guardian.

The birth parent, legal guardian, or adoptive parent of a child may place his child for adoption directly with the adoptive parents of his choice. Consent to the proposed adoption shall be executed upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter before a juvenile and domestic relations district court or, if the birth parent or legal guardian does not reside in Virginia, before a court having jurisdiction over child custody matters in the jurisdiction where the birth parent or legal guardian resides when requested by a juvenile and domestic relations district court of this Commonwealth, pursuant to §

20-146.11

. Consent proceedings shall be advanced on the juvenile and domestic relations district court docket so as to be heard by the court within ten days of filing of the petition, or as soon thereafter as practicable so as to provide the earliest possible disposition.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.37; 2001, c. 305; 2002, c. 747; 2009, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to removal of child from adoptive home, see §

63.2-1207

. As to appointment of counsel and guardian ad litem, see § 16.1-266.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 inserted “or adoptive parent,” made a related change, and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Jurisdiction. —

Motion filed by a mother and father to dismiss foster parents’ adoption petition was granted because the case did not involve a parental placement within the meaning of §§

63.2-1230

through

63.2-1240

; the custody order did not mention any placement for the purpose of foster care or adoption, and neither birth parent placed the child with the foster parents for adoption. In re Terry, 78 Va. Cir. 25, 2008 Va. Cir. LEXIS 272 (Henrico County Nov. 13, 2008).

Parental placement adoption denied. —

Petition did not meet the requirements for a parental placement adoption since neither birth parent consented to the placement, a consent hearing had not been conducted, and the court could not certify compliance with §

63.2-1232

, since the trial court did not make a determination regarding the home study and the Virginia Department of Social Services did not recommend the prospective parents for placement. In re Pruett, 87 Va. Cir. 68, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 80 (Roanoke County Aug. 15, 2013).

§ 63.2-1231.
Home study; meeting required; exception.

Prior to the consent hearing in the juvenile and domestic relations district court, a home study of the adoptive parent(s) shall be completed by a licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency and the prospective adoptive parents shall be informed that information about shaken baby syndrome, its effects, and resources for help and support for caretakers is available on a website maintained by the Department in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. Home studies by local boards shall be conducted in accordance with the Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto developed by the Department. All home studies conducted pursuant to this section, whether by a local board or a child-placing agency, shall make inquiry as to (i) whether the prospective adoptive parents are financially able, morally suitable, and in satisfactory physical and mental health to enable them to care for the child; (ii) the physical and mental condition of the child, if known; (iii) the circumstances under which the child came to live, or will be living, in the home of the prospective adoptive family, as applicable; (iv) what fees have been paid by the prospective adoptive family or in their behalf in the placement and adoption of the child; (v) whether the requirements of subdivisions A 1, A 2, A 3, and A 5 of §

63.2-1232

have been met; and (vi) any other matters specified by the circuit court. In the course of the home study, the agency social worker, family-services specialist, or other qualified equivalent worker shall meet at least once with the birth parent(s) and at least once with the prospective adoptive parents. Upon agreement of both parties, such meetings may occur simultaneously or separately.

Any home study conducted pursuant to this section for the purpose of parental placement or agency placement shall be valid for a period of 36 months from the date of completion of the study. However, the Board may, by regulation, require an additional state criminal background check before finalizing an adoption if more than 18 months have passed from the completion of the home study.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.38; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, c. 808; 2008, c. 494; 2010, c. 551; 2014, c. 285; 2017, c. 193.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Acts 2017, c. 193, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services is authorized to amend or update its Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto when necessary to improve the process of adoptive and foster placements, provided such amendments or updates do not lessen the requirements of the home study process.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “When the child has been placed with prospective adoptive parents who are related to the child as specified in subdivision 6 of § 63.1-1233, this meeting is not required.” Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 808, in the third sentence, substituted
“at least once with the prospective adoptive parents” for “prospective adoptive parents simultaneously”; and added the present last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 494 designated the existing provisions as subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 551 inserted “and the prospective adoptive parents shall be informed that information about shaken baby syndrome, its effects, and resources for help and support for caretakers is available on a website maintained by the Department” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 285, effective March 24, 2014, in subsection A, inserted “family-services specialist, or other qualified equivalent worker” in the third sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 193, in subsection A, inserted the second sentence, and substituted “All home studies conducted pursuant to this section, whether by a local board or a child-placing agency” for “The home study” in the third sentence.

§ 63.2-1232.
Requirements of a parental placement adoption; exception.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall not accept consent until it determines that:

The birth parent(s) are aware of alternatives to adoption, adoption procedures, and opportunities for placement with other adoptive families, and that the birth parents’ consent is informed and uncoerced.

A licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency has counseled the prospective adoptive parents with regard to alternatives to adoption, adoption procedures, including the need to address the parental rights of birth parents, the procedures for terminating such rights, and opportunities for adoption of other children; that the prospective adoptive parents’ decision is informed and uncoerced; and that they intend to file an adoption petition and proceed toward a final order of adoption.

The birth parent(s) and adoptive parents have exchanged identifying information including but not limited to full names, addresses, physical, mental, social and psychological information and any other information necessary to promote the welfare of the child, unless both parties agree in writing to waive the disclosure of full names and addresses.

Any financial agreement or exchange of property among the parties and any fees charged or paid for services related to the placement or adoption of the child have been disclosed to the court and that all parties understand that no binding contract regarding placement or adoption of the child exists.

There has been no violation of the provisions of §

63.2-1218

in connection with the placement; however, if it appears there has been such violation, the court shall not reject consent of the birth parent to the adoption for that reason alone but shall report the alleged violation as required by §

63.2-1219

.

A licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency has conducted a home study of the prospective adoptive home in accordance with regulations established by the Board and, in the case of home studies by local boards, in accordance with the Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto developed by the Department, and has provided to the court a report of such home study, which shall contain the agency’s recommendation regarding the suitability of the placement. A married couple or an unmarried individual shall be eligible to receive placement of a child for adoption.

The birth parent(s) have been informed of their opportunity to be represented by legal counsel.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall not accept the consent if the requirements of subsection A have not been met. In such cases, it shall refer the birth parent to a licensed or duly authorized child-placing agency for investigation and recommendation in accordance with §§

63.2-1208

and

63.2-1238

. If the juvenile and domestic relations district court determines that any of the parties is financially unable to obtain the required services, it shall refer the matter to the local director.

In cases in which a birth parent who resides in the Commonwealth places his child for adoption with adoptive parents in another state and the laws of that receiving state govern the proceeding for adoption, the birth parent may elect to waive the execution of consent pursuant to §

63.2-1233

and instead execute consent to the adoption pursuant to the laws of the receiving state. Any waiver of consent made pursuant to this subsection shall be made under oath and in writing, and shall expressly state that the birth parent has received independent legal counsel from an attorney licensed in the Commonwealth of Virginia advising him of the laws of the Commonwealth, the laws of the receiving state pursuant to which he elects to consent to the adoption, and the effects of his waiver of consent pursuant to §

63.2-1233

and election to consent pursuant to the laws of the receiving state. Any waiver of consent and election to consent pursuant to the laws of a receiving state shall include the name, address, and telephone number of such legal counsel. Failure to comply with this section shall render a waiver of consent pursuant to § 63.2-1233 and election to consent pursuant to the laws of the receiving state as authorized by this subsection invalid.

When consent to a parental placement adoption is sought pursuant to this article and the prospective adoptive parent(s) have had continuous physical and legal custody of the child for five or more years, the juvenile and domestic relations district court may, in its discretion, accept consent without (i) a home study as required by subsection A of §

63.2-1231

and subdivision A 6 of this section and (ii) the meeting and counseling requirements, as they relate to the prospective adoptive parent(s), listed in subsection A of §

63.2-1231

and subdivision A 2 of this section. All other provisions of the parental placement adoption statutes shall apply.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.39; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 654, 825, 848; 2010, c. 276; 2015, c. 529; 2017, c. 193.

Cross references.

For provision that on a petition for parental placement adoption, the court shall not waive the requirements of §

63.2-1232

, see §

63.2-1237

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Acts 2017, c. 193, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services is authorized to amend or update its Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto when necessary to improve the process of adoptive and foster placements, provided such amendments or updates do not lessen the requirements of the home study process.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 654, 825, and 848 are identical, and added the language beginning “unless both parties” at the end of subdivision A 3. Acts 2006, cc. 654 and 848 are effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 276 added subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 529 added subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 193 inserted “and, in the case of home studies by local boards, in accordance with the Mutual Family Assessment home study template and any addenda thereto developed by the Department” in subdivision A 6.

§ 63.2-1233.
Consent to be executed in juvenile and domestic relations district court; exceptions.

When the juvenile and domestic relations district court is satisfied that all requirements of §

63.2-1232

have been met with respect to at least one birth parent and the adoptive child is at least in the third calendar day of life, that birth parent or both birth parents, as the case may be, shall execute consent to the proposed adoption in compliance with the provisions of §

63.2-1202

while before the juvenile and domestic relations district court in person and in the presence of the prospective adoptive parents. The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall accept the consent of the birth parent(s) and transfer custody of the child to the prospective adoptive parents, pending notification to any nonconsenting birth parent, as described hereinafter.

The execution of consent before the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall not be required of a birth father if the birth father consents under oath and in writing to the adoption.

The consent of a birth father who is not married to the mother of the child at the time of the child’s conception or birth shall not be required if the putative father named by the birth mother denies under oath and in writing the paternity of the child or if the putative father did not register with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) of this chapter. If the identity of the birth father is reasonably ascertainable, but the whereabouts of the birth father are not reasonably ascertainable, verification of compliance with the Virginia Birth Father Registry shall be provided to the court.

When a birth father is required to be given notice, he may be given notice of the adoption by registered or certified mail to his last known address and if he fails to object to the adoption within 15 days of the mailing of such notice, his consent shall not be required. An objection shall be in writing, signed by the objecting party or counsel of record for the objecting party and shall be filed with the clerk of the juvenile and domestic relations district court in which the petition was filed during the business day of the court, within the time period specified in this section. When no timely objection is filed, no hearing on this issue is required. Failure of the objecting party to appear at any scheduled hearing, either in person or by counsel, shall constitute a waiver of such objection.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court may accept the written consent of the birth father at the time of the child’s conception or birth, provided that his identifying information required in §

63.2-1232

is filed in writing with the juvenile and domestic relations district court of jurisdiction. Such consent shall advise the birth father of his opportunity for legal representation, shall identify the court in which the case was or is intended to be filed, and shall be presented to the juvenile and domestic relations district court for acceptance. The consent may waive further notice of the adoption proceedings and shall contain the name, address and telephone number of the birth father’s legal counsel or an acknowledgment that he was informed of his opportunity to be represented by legal counsel and declined such representation. For good cause shown, the court may dispense with the requirements regarding the filing of the birth father’s identifying information pursuant to this subdivision 1. d.

In the event that the birth mother’s consent is not executed in the juvenile and domestic relations district court, the consent of the birth father shall be executed in the juvenile and domestic relations district court.

A child born to a married birth mother shall be presumed to be the child of her husband and his consent shall be required, unless the court finds that the father’s consent is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child as provided in §

63.2-1205

or if his consent is unobtainable. The consent of such presumed father shall be under oath and in writing and may be executed in or out of court. The presumption that the husband is the father of the child may be rebutted by sufficient evidence, satisfactory to the juvenile and domestic relations district court, which would establish by a preponderance of the evidence the paternity of another man or the impossibility or improbability of cohabitation of the birth mother and her husband for a period of at least 300 days preceding the birth of the child, in which case the husband’s consent shall not be required. The executed denial of paternity by the putative father shall be sufficient to rebut the presumption that he is the father of the child. If the court is satisfied that the presumption has been rebutted, notice of the adoption shall not be required to be given to the presumed father.

After the application of the provisions of subdivision 1, if a birth parent is entitled to a hearing, the birth parent shall be given notice of the date and location of the hearing and be given the opportunity to appear before the juvenile and domestic relations district court. Such hearing may occur subsequent to the proceeding wherein the consenting birth parent appeared but may not be held until 15 days after personal service of notice on the nonconsenting birth parent, or if personal service is unobtainable, 10 days after the completion of the execution of an order of publication against such birth parent. The juvenile and domestic relations district court may appoint counsel for the birth parent(s). If the juvenile and domestic relations district court finds that consent is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, as set forth in §

63.2-1205

, or is unobtainable, it may grant the petition without such consent and enter an order waiving the requirement of consent of the nonconsenting birth parent and transferring custody of the child to the prospective adoptive parents. No further consent or notice shall be required of a birth parent who fails to appear at any scheduled hearing, either in person or by counsel. If the juvenile and domestic relations district court denies the petition, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall order that any consent given for the purpose of such placement shall be void and, if necessary, the court shall determine custody of the child as between the birth parents.

Except as provided in subdivisions 4 and 5, if consent cannot be obtained from at least one birth parent, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall deny the petition and determine custody of the child pursuant to § 16.1-278.2.

If a child has been under the physical care and custody of the prospective adoptive parents and if both birth parents have failed, without good cause, to appear at a hearing to execute consent under this section for which they were given proper notice pursuant to § 16.1-264, the juvenile and domestic relations district court may grant the petition without the consent of either birth parent and enter an order waiving consent and transferring custody of the child to the prospective adoptive parents. Prior to the entry of such an order, the juvenile and domestic relations district court may appoint legal counsel for the birth parents and shall find by clear and convincing evidence (i) that the birth parents were given proper notice of the hearing(s) to execute consent and of the hearing to proceed without their consent; (ii) that the birth parents failed to show good cause for their failure to appear at such hearing(s); and (iii) that pursuant to §

63.2-1205

, the consent of the birth parents is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child or is unobtainable. Under this subdivision, the court or the parties may waive the requirement of the simultaneous meeting under §

63.2-1231

and the requirements of subdivisions A 1, A 3, and A 7 of §

63.2-1232

where the opportunity for compliance is not reasonably available under the applicable circumstances.

If both birth parents are deceased, the juvenile and domestic relations district court, after hearing evidence to that effect, may grant the petition without the filing of any consent.

No consent shall be required from the birth father of a child placed pursuant to this section when such father is convicted of a violation of subsection A of §

18.2-61

, §

18.2-63

, subsection B of §

18.2-366

, or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction, and the child was conceived as a result of such violation, nor shall the birth father be entitled to notice of any of the proceedings under this section.

No consent shall be required of a birth father if he denies under oath and in writing the paternity of the child. Such denial of paternity may be withdrawn no more than 10 days after it is executed. Once the child is 10 days old, any executed denial of paternity is final and constitutes a waiver of all rights with the respect to the adoption of the child and cannot be withdrawn.

A birth father may consent to the adoption prior to the birth of the child.

The juvenile and domestic relations district court shall review each order entered under this section at least annually until such time as the final order of adoption is entered.

When there has been an interstate transfer of the child in a parental placement adoption in compliance with Chapter 10 (§

63.2-1000

et seq.) of this title, all matters relating to the adoption of the child including, but not limited to, custody and parentage shall be determined in the court of appropriate jurisdiction in the state that was approved for finalization of the adoption by the interstate compact authorities.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.40; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 890; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2009, c. 805; 2017, c. 200.

Cross references.

As to removal of child from adoptive home, see §

63.2-1207

. As to jurisdiction of juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see § 16.1-241. As to venue in juvenile and domestic relations district court proceedings, see § 16.1-243.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 890 inserted “or an equivalent offense of another state, the United States, or any foreign jurisdiction” in subdivision 7; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are nearly the same, and rewrote the section. Subdivision 1 b, as amended by c. 825 included a reference to the Putative Father Registry. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and deleted “who is not married to the mother of the child at the time of the child’s conception or birth” following “birth father” in subdivision 1 a; rewrote subdivision 1 b as two sentences adding “verification of compliance with the Putative Father Registry shall be provided to the court” at the end; deleted “who is not married to the birth mother of the child” following “birth father” in the first sentence, inserted “shall identify the court in which the case was or is intended to be filed” in the second sentence and added the last sentence in subdivision 1 d; deleted “who is not married to the birth mother of the child” following “birth father” in subdivision 1 e; added the fourth sentence in subdivision 1 f; rewrote the first sentence and added the fifth sentence in subdivision 2; substituted “subdivisions 4 and 5” for “subdivision 4” in subdivision 3; deleted “which order shall become effective 15 days thereafter” at the end of the first sentence in subdivision 4; deleted “not married to the mother of the child” following “birth father” and substituted “adoption” for “termination of all of his parental rights” in subdivision 8 and added subdivision 10.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 805 inserted “but the whereabouts of the birth father are not reasonably ascertainable” in the second sentence of subdivision 1 b; and substituted “If a child has been under the physical care and custody of” for “If the child was placed by the birth parent(s) with” at the beginning of subdivision 4.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” twice in subdivision 1 b.

Law Review.

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Courts. § 1.05 District Courts. Chapter 32 Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. § 32.02 Proceedings in Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts. Friend.

§ 63.2-1234.
When consent is revocable.

Consent shall be revocable as follows:

By either consenting birth parent for any reason for up to seven days from its execution; however, such seven-day revocation period may be waived in writing at the time of consent provided that the child is at least 10 days old and the consenting birth parent acknowledges having received independent legal counsel regarding the effect of such waiver. In the case of two consenting birth parents, the waiver by one consenting birth parent shall not affect the right of the second consenting birth parent to retain his seven-day revocation period.

Such revocation shall be in writing, signed by the revoking party or counsel of record for the revoking party and shall be filed with the clerk of the juvenile and domestic relations district court in which the petition was filed during the business day of the juvenile and domestic relations district court, within the time period specified in this section. If the revocation period expires on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or any day on which the clerk’s office is closed as authorized by statute, the revocation period shall be extended to the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday or other day on which the clerk’s office is closed as authorized by statute.

Upon the filing of a valid revocation within the time period set out in this section, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall order that any consent given for the purpose of such placement is void and, if necessary, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall determine custody of the child as between the birth parents.

By any party prior to the final order of adoption (i) upon proof of fraud or duress or (ii) after placement of the child in an adoptive home, upon written, mutual consent of the birth parents and prospective adoptive parents.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.41; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2008, c. 662.

Cross references.

For provision that after expiration of the revocation period there shall be no presumption in favor of a birth parent with regard to a child who has been placed for adoption, and that upon motion the court shall determine whether the parent’s consent is required and whether such consent is being withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, see §

63.2-1206

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are virtually identical, and in subdivision 1, substituted “10 days” for “fifteen days” in the first sentence and added the last sentence. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 662 rewrote the introductory paragraph of subdivision 1, which read: “By either consenting birth parent for any reason for up to 10 days from its execution. Once the child is 10 days old, no executed consent can be withdrawn.”

§ 63.2-1235.
Adoptive home not in child’s best interests.

If the juvenile and domestic relations district court determines from the information provided to it that placement in the prospective adoptive home will be contrary to the best interests of the child, it shall so inform the birth parents. If the birth parents choose not to retain custody of the child nor to designate other prospective adoptive parents, or if the birth parents’ whereabouts are not reasonably ascertainable, the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall determine custody of the child.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.42; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1236.
Duty of Department to disseminate information.

The Department shall develop and disseminate information to the public regarding the provisions of parental placement adoptions, including the desirability of initiating the procedures required by §

63.2-1232

as early in the placement and adoption process as possible to ensure that birth parents are aware of the provisions of this law and begin required procedures in a timely manner.

History.

1989, c. 647, § 63.1-220.3; 1991, cc. 364, 602; 1992, c. 125; 1993, cc. 338, 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 1999, c. 1028; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.43; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1237.
Petition for parental placement adoption; jurisdiction; contents.

Proceedings for the parental placement adoption of a minor child and for a change of name of such child shall be instituted only by petition to the circuit court in the county or city in which the petitioner resides or in the county or city where a birth parent has executed a consent pursuant to §

63.2-1233

. Such petition may be filed by any natural person who resides in the Commonwealth or is the adopting parent(s) of a child who was subject to a consent proceeding held pursuant to §

63.2-1233

. The petition shall ask leave to adopt a minor child not legally the petitioner’s by birth and, if it is so desired by the petitioner, also to change the name of such child. In the case of married persons, the petition shall be the joint petition of the husband and wife but, in the event the child to be adopted is legally the child by birth or adoption of one of the petitioners, such petitioner shall unite in the petition for the purpose of indicating his or her consent to the prayer thereof only. The petition shall contain a full disclosure of the circumstances under which the child came to live, and is living, in the home of the petitioner. Each petition for adoption shall be signed by the petitioner as well as by counsel of record, if any. In any case in which the petition seeks the entry of an adoption order without referral for investigation, the petition shall be under oath.

The petition shall state that the findings required by §

63.2-1232

have been made and shall be accompanied by appropriate documentation supporting such statement, to include copies of documents executing consent and transferring custody of the child to the prospective adoptive parents, and a copy of the report required by §

63.2-1231

. The court shall not waive any of the requirements of this paragraph nor any of the requirements of §

63.2-1232

except as allowed pursuant to subsection D of § 63.2-1232 or subdivision 4 of §

63.2-1233

.

A single petition for adoption under the provisions of this section shall be sufficient for the concurrent adoption by the same petitioners of two or more children who have the same birth parent or parents; and nothing in this section shall be construed as having heretofore required a separate petition for each of such children.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-348; 1952, c. 550; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 300; 1964, c. 459; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-221; 1970, c. 672; 1973, c. 406; 1975, c. 461; 1978, c. 730; 1983, c. 614; 1988, c. 882; 1989, c. 647; 1991, cc. 76, 602; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.44; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2015, c. 529.

Cross references.

As to venue in juvenile and domestic relations district court proceedings, see § 16.1-243.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 are identical, and in the first paragraph, added the language beginning “or in the county” to the end of the first sentence, divided the former second sentence into the second and third sentences by adding “The petition shall ask” preceding “leave to adopt” and substituted the language beginning “or is the adopting parent(s)” for “for” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “the petitioner’s” for “his” in the third sentence; and added the exception at the end of the last sentence in the second paragraph. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006. Acts 2006, c. 825, is effective July 1, 2007.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 529 inserted “subsection D of §

63.2-1232

or” in the second paragraph.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Parental placement adoption denied. —

Petition did not meet the requirements for a parental placement adoption since neither birth parent consented to the placement, a consent hearing had not been conducted, and the court could not certify compliance with §

63.2-1232

, since the trial court did not make a determination regarding the home study and the Virginia Department of Social Services did not recommend the prospective parents for placement. In re Pruett, 87 Va. Cir. 68, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 80 (Roanoke County Aug. 15, 2013).

§ 63.2-1238.
Forwarding of petition; when investigation and report not required.

Upon the filing of the petition, the circuit court shall forward a copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto to the Commissioner and to the local director where the petitioners reside or resided at the time of filing the petition, or had legal residence at the time of the filing of the petition. However, in cases where a licensed child-placing agency has completed a home study, the petition and all exhibits shall be forwarded to the licensed child-placing agency.

In parental placement adoptions where consent has been properly executed, no investigation and report pursuant to §

63.2-1208

is required. However, the circuit court may order a thorough investigation of the matter and report in which case the provisions of §

63.2-1208

shall apply.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-349; 1954, c. 489; 1956, c. 489; 1956, c. 187; 1962, c. 603; 1964, c. 429; 1968, cc. 346, 578, § 63.1-223; 1974, cc. 26, 493, 507; 1975, c. 364; 1978, c. 730; 1980, c. 740; 1982, c. 115; 1988, cc. 579, 599, 882; 1989, c. 647; 1992, c. 607; 1993, c. 553; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.45; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

For requirements of a parental placement adoption, see §

63.2-1232

.

§ 63.2-1239.
Return of copies furnished to counsel.

Any copy of the report required by §

63.2-1208

to be furnished to counsel of record representing the adopting parent or parents shall, upon the entry of a final order of adoption, or other final disposition of the matter, be returned by such counsel, without having been duplicated, to the clerk of the circuit court in which final disposition of the matter is had, to be disposed of as is required by §

63.2-1246

for the return of the original report.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-350; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-224; 1974, c. 26; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.46; 2002, c. 747.